Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB84.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 39A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "association" means the Kentucky Coroners Association.
(2) County coroners, in consultation with the association, shall:
(a) Create ten (10) emergency response districts that include twelve (12)
counties each to cover all counties in Kentucky to ensure a timely response
to multiple fatality events; and
(b) Equip each emergency response district with an emergency response trailer
and necessary equipment to enable a response to any natural disaster,
multiple fatality event, or as needed to respond to fatalities within the
Commonwealth.
(3) The Division of Emergency Management shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to effectuate this section.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$200,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Military Affairs budget unit to distribute to the
Kentucky Coroners Association for the actual expense of purchasing and outfitting
emergency response trailers and necessary equipment to respond to events outlined in
Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. Whereas providing timely funding for multiple fatality events in the
Commonwealth is important for the citizens of the state, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/12/2026 2:39 PM Jacketed